North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 66A. Transportation of Swine.

§ 106-798.
Identification required to transport swine.

No live swine shall be transported on a public road within the State unless the swine has an official form of identification approved by the State Veterinarian for this purpose.

Any live swine that is transported on a public road within this State without identification as required by this section is presumed to be a feral swine and is also subject to regulation by the Wildlife Resources Commission under Chapter 113 of the General Statutes. Any person transporting a swine without identification is subject to a civil penalty under this Article.

Swine that do not leave the premises of the swine owner are not subject to the identification requirement under this section.

The Board of Agriculture shall adopt rules to charge any swine owner a fee for the identification required under this section. The fee may not exceed the actual cost to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for the identification approved by the State Veterinarian and any direct administrative costs associated with providing the identification to swine owners. The Board of Agriculture shall adopt any other rules necessary to implement this Article.

History.

2011-326, s. 19.7; 2011-369, s. 1.

§ 106-798.1.
Penalty for unlawful transport of swine without identification.

Any person who fails to obtain identification as required under this Article shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. Each swine that has no identification is a separate violation.

History.

2011-326, s. 19.7; 2011-369, s. 1.

§ 106-798.2.
Penalty for misuse of identification.

Any person who misuses the identification required under this Article shall be subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each occurrence. A person misuses identification required under this Article by knowingly providing it to other than the owner of the swine or by engaging in other activity that is in violation of this Article.

History.

2011-326, s. 19.7; 2011-369, s. 1.

§ 106-799.

Reserved for future codification purposes.